Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-2308
Out-of-state trust company with instate branch trust office; representative trust offices; authorized; when.

An out-of-state trust company which has established and maintains at least one branch trust office in this state pursuant to the Interstate Trust Company Office Act may establish and maintain representative trust offices in Nebraska only if (1) the requirements of section 8-2309 are met and (2) the home state of the out-of-state trust company authorizes the establishment and maintenance of representative trust offices in that state by a Nebraska trust company under conditions no more restrictive than those imposed by the laws of Nebraska, as determined by the director.

Laws 1998, LB 1321, § 61.